Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Article 1. In General
§ 34-1-133.
Release; mortgage of deceased nonresident mortgagee.

Whenever any nonresident of this state shall die without this state, owing, at the time of his death, debts secured by mortgage or other incumbrance upon real or personal property situated in this state, and the debtor shall make voluntary payment of such debt to the executor of the last will and testament of such deceased person, or to the administrator of the estate of such deceased person, whose letters testamentary or of administration, as the case may be, were issued from the proper court of the state or territory of the United States, where such deceased creditor resided at the time of his death, it shall be lawful and competent for such executor or administrator to execute a full and valid release, and acquittance of such debt, and of the mortgage or other incumbrance securing the same; provided, that there shall be attached to such release and acquittance, and made a part thereof, a full and complete transcript of the records of the court issuing such letters testamentary or of administration, as the case may be, certified to by the clerk of such court, or other proper custodian of the records thereof, under his hand and under the seal of such court, fully exhibiting the due appointment and qualification of such executor or administrator, and there shall also be attached to such release and made a part thereof, a certificate under the hand of the presiding judge of such court, or the clerk thereof, that at the date of such release, the person or persons executing the same, was such duly appointed and qualified executor or administrator, as set forth in such release. Any release so executed shall be admitted to record, in this state, in the office of any of the county clerks and upon being recorded in the proper office, the county clerk shall discharge the mortgage or other incumbrance in such release mentioned, in the manner provided by law, but this section shall not be construed to authorize any administrator appointed by the courts of any other state or territory of the United States, to exercise any power, within the state other than the power to receive voluntary payments of debts due to his intestate, and to release mortgages or other incumbrances upon property situate in this state and securing such debts.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 26, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1899, § 2802; C.S. 1910, § 3694; C.S. 1920, § 4652; R.S. 1931, § 71-224; C.S. 1945, § 66-135; W.S. 1957, § 34-34; Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the second sentence, deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “any of the county clerks” and substituted “county clerk” for “register of deeds” preceding “shall discharge the
mortgage.”

Cited

in

Security-First Nat'l Bank v. King, 46 Wyo. 59, 23 P.2d 851,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 32

, 90 A.L.R. 125 (1933).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part III,” IX Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1974).

§ 34-1-134.
Release; mortgage of bankrupt corporation mortgagee.

It shall be the duty of any county clerk within the state of Wyoming, upon request of any person and the filing in his office of a certified copy of an order of discharge of any receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of any national or state bank, trust company or building and loan association, to cancel of record any unreleased and unassigned mortgage or deed of trust of record in his office in which such national or state bank, trust company, or building and loan association, is mortgagee by releasing the said mortgage or deed of trust in the record where the same has been placed of record, and said release shall be effective and constitute a discharge of the lien of said mortgage or trust deed upon the real property covered by the same in the same manner and to the same effect as if said release had been made by the mortgagee thereof.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 36, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 66-136; W.S. 1957, § 34-35; Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 206; 2019 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “any county clerk.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "in the record" for "on the margin of the book”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Debts arising from penalties as exceptions to bankruptcy discharge under §§ 523(a)(7), (13) and 1328(a) of Bankruptcy Code of 1978 (11 U.S.C. §§ 523 (A)(7), (13), and 1328(A)), 150 ALR Fed 159.

§ 34-1-135.
Covenants; not implied in conveyances; exception.

No covenant shall be implied in any conveyance of real estate other than a conveyance of oil, gas or other minerals whether such conveyance contains special covenants or not.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 2734; C.S. 1910, § 3626; C.S. 1920, § 4582; R.S. 1931, § 97-107; C.S. 1945, § 66-105; Laws 1957, ch. 41, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-36.

Cross references. —

As to form and effect of short form of warranty deed, see §§

34-2-102

,

34-2-103

.

As to implied covenants in a deed, see also §

34-2-103

.

As to when covenants implied in form of real estate mortgage, see §

34-2-108

.

This section should not be so literally applied as to defeat the clear intention of the parties

as gathered from the context of the instrument. Dawson v. Meike, 508 P.2d 15,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1973).

Of importance is the intention of the parties

as it may be gleaned from the words and expressions used in leases and contracts and of the circumstances bearing upon and incident to them. Ayres Jewelry Co. v. O & S Bldg., 419 P.2d 628,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1966).

Words relating to use construed as express covenant. —

A paramount purpose, from a lessor's standpoint, is the amount of rent to be received, and when that amount is variable and conditioned upon the use to be made of the leased premises, words relating to the use intended are of primary importance and must be construed and interpreted to have been intended as an express covenant that the occupancy specified shall be continued during the entire lease period so as to provide a constant base upon which the agreed rent formula may be applied and the rent computed. Ayres Jewelry Co. v. O & S Bldg., 419 P.2d 628,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1966).

To interpret a contract for the conveyance of an interest in oil and gas

the court should consider not only the terms of the writing but also the surrounding circumstances, attendant facts showing the relations of the parties, the nature and situation of the subject matter, and the apparent purpose of making the contract. Dawson v. Meike, 508 P.2d 15,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1973).

Eviction by false representation. —

Under five year lease containing a clause, that if any part of the real estate is sold, the lease may be terminated at any yearly period on 90 days notice, falsely representing a sale and cancelling lease was not necessarily grounds for an action in deceit, but plaintiff might maintain an action for breach of contract or tort on theory of eviction by false representations. Diamond Cattle Co. v. Clark, 52 Wyo. 265, 74 P.2d 857,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1937).

Quoted

in

Laramie Printing Trustees v. Krueger, 437 P.2d 856,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1968).

Stated

in

McGinnis v. McGinnis, 391 P.2d 927,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1964).

Law reviews. —

For a note dealing with implied covenants in oil and gas leases, see 11 Wyo. L.J. 57.

For comment, “Landlord-Tenant Reform: Toward a Warranty of Habitability for Leased Residential Premises in Wyoming,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 765 (1983).

For case note, “Oil and Gas — The Burden of Proof in Implied Covenant to Develop Cases: Wyoming Rejects the ‘Oklahoma Rule.’ Sonat Exploration Co. v. Superior Oil Co., 710 P.2d 221,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 609

(Wyo. 1985),” see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 141 (1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and effect of restrictive covenants as to trees and shrubbery, 13 ALR4th 1346.

Community residence for mentally disabled persons as violation of restrictive covenant, 41 ALR4th 1216.

Radio or television aerials, antennas, towers or satellite dishes or discs as within terms of covenant restricting use, erection or maintenance of such structures upon residential property, 76 ALR4th 498.

§ 34-1-136.
Covenants; not implied for payment of sum secured by mortgage.

No mortgage shall be construed as implying a covenant for the payment of the sum thereby intended to be secured, where there shall be no express covenant for such payment contained in the mortgage, and, if no bond or other separate instrument to secure such payment shall be given, the remedies of the mortgagee shall be confined to the lands mentioned in the mortgage.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 1, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 2795; C.S. 1910, § 3687; C.S. 1920, § 4645; R.S. 1931, § 71-217; C.S. 1945, § 66-106; W.S. 1957, § 34-37.

§ 34-1-137.
Fees tail prohibited; future interests of fees tail; worthier title doctrine abolished.

The creation of fees tail is not permitted. The use in an otherwise effective conveyance of property of language appropriate to create a fee tail, creates a fee simple in the person who would have taken a fee tail. Any future interest limited upon such an interest is a limitation upon the fee simple and its validity is determined accordingly.

The doctrine of worthier title is abolished as a rule of law and as a rule of construction. Language in a will, trust agreement, beneficiary designation or other governing instrument describing the beneficiaries of a disposition as “heirs,” “heirs at law,” “next of kin,” “distributees,” “relatives” or “family” or language of similar import, does not create or presumptively create a reversionary interest in the transferor.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 93, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-38; 2011, ch. 77, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (b).

Repeal of prior legislation. —

Section 66-137, W.C.S. 1945, abolishing estates tail, was repealed by § 2, ch. 93, Laws 1949.

This section did not deprive defendants of vested property rights without due process of law

as there are no heirs, but only heirs apparent, to the living, persons with mere expectancies or possibilities of inheritance. Jensen v. Jensen, 54 Wyo. 224, 89 P.2d 1085,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1939) (construing § 66-137, W.C.S. 1945).

Because they had no vested property rights. —

An heir apparent has no vested right in the estate of his ancestor prior to the latter's death, and no vested property rights therein, so that legislation dealing with estates of persons who died after its effective date does not deal with vested rights. Jensen v. Jensen, 54 Wyo. 224, 89 P.2d 1085,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1939) (construing § 66-137, W.C.S. 1945).

The legislature by special act may change an entailed estate to that of a fee simple estate, as by so doing it does not take any right of property from anyone and vest it in another. Jensen v. Jensen, 54 Wyo. 224, 89 P.2d 1085,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1939) (construing § 66-137, W.C.S. 1945).

And rights could be changed by statute. —

Where property was conveyed to grantee and “heirs of her body” before enactment of statute abolishing indefinite restrictions on power of alienation in estates tail, “heirs of her body” took fee simple estate, since grantors, heirs, and issue of heirs of body of grantee, had no vested interest in the property which could not be changed by statute. Jensen v. Jensen, 54 Wyo. 224, 89 P.2d 1085,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1939) (construing § 66-137, W.C.S. 1945).

Remedial statute. —

A remedial statute is one which does not create, enlarge, diminish, or destroy vested rights. Jensen v. Jensen, 54 Wyo. 224, 89 P.2d 1085,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1939) (construing § 66-137, W.C.S. 1945).

Law reviews. —

See “Survival of Certain Feudal Law Concepts in Wyoming,” 2 Wyo. L.J. 91.

§ 34-1-138.
Perpetuities; short title.

This act [§§

34-1-138

,

34-1-139

] may be cited as the “Model Rule Against Perpetuities Act”.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 92, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 34-39.

Cited

in

Holland v. Windsor, 461 P.2d 47,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1969).

§ 34-1-139.
Perpetuities; time limits for vesting; restrictions on selected lives; legislative intent.

No interest in real property shall be valid unless it must vest not later than twenty-one (21) years after some life in being at the creation of the interest and any period of gestation involved in the situation to which the limitation applies. The lives selected to govern the time of vesting must not be so numerous nor so situated that evidence of their deaths is likely to be unreasonably difficult to obtain. It is intended by this subsection to make effective in this state the American common-law rule against perpetuities for interests in real property.

A trust created after July 1, 2003, owning or holding property other than or in addition to interests in real property, shall continue for up to one thousand (1,000) years after the trust’s creation, unless some earlier term is expressly set forth in the trust instrument, so long as:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 47, § 2.

The trust is governed by the laws of this state;

The trustee maintains a place of business, administers the trust in this state or is a resident of this state; and

The trust terms require that any power of appointment over the trust property, other than interests in real property, terminate and all such interests in trust property vest or terminate no later than one thousand (1,000) years after the trust’s creation or such earlier date as is set forth in the trust instrument.

and (d) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 47, § 2.

If a trust owns or holds both interests in real property and interests in property other than real property, subsection (a) of this section shall apply to any real property interests held in the trust and subsection (b) shall apply to the remaining property of the trust.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 92, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-40; Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 2; 2019 ch. 47, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), deleted “or personal” preceding “property,” substituted “valid” for “good,” “subsection” for “the enactment of this statute,” and added “for interests in real property”; in the beginning of (b), deleted “Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to,” added “owning or holding property other than or in addition to interests in real property, shall continue for up to one thousand (1,000) years after the trust's creation, unless some earlier term is expressly set forth in the trust instrument, so long as,” made related changes, and added (b)(iv), (b)(v) and (e).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 47, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (b)(i) and (b)(ii), (c) and (d) which read:

“(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a trust created after July 1, 2003 if:

“(i) The instrument creating the trust states that the rule against perpetuities as provided in subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to the trust;

“(ii) The instrument creating the trust states that the trust shall terminate no later than one thousand (1,000) years after the trust's creation; and

“(c) The election provided in subsection (b) of this section shall not be available to real property owned and held in a trust making an election under subsection (b) of this section. Subsection (a) of this section shall apply to such real property held in a trust making an election under subsection (b) of this section. Subsection (b) of this section shall apply to the remaining assets of such trust.

“(d) Real property for the purpose of subsection (b) of this section shall not include a mineral interest or an interest in a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, business trust or other entity.”

Cross references. —

See also art. 1, § 30, Wyo. Const.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 3, ch. 92, Laws 1949, repealed all acts or parts of acts inconsistent with that act.

Applicability.—

Revocable
charitable trust did not violate the rule against perpetuities where
the beneficiaries' interest in the trust property was fixed and vested
upon the initial beneficiary's death. Shriners Hosps. for Children v. First Northern Bank of Wyo., 2016 WY 51, 373 P.3d 392,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2016).

In a chapter 11 core proceeding, the bankruptcy court held that plaintiff’s overriding royalty interests pursuant to the areas of mutual interest clause within the parties’ fossil agreement was a purely contractual interest to which Wyoming’s Rule Against Perpetuities did not apply because the agreement did not create any interest in a specific parcel of land. Gasconade Oil Co. v. Ultra Res., Inc. (In re Ultra Petroleum Corp.), 2018 Bankr. LEXIS 3574 (Bankr. S.D. Tex. Nov. 9, 2018).

Court without authority to carve out exception to rule against perpetuities. —

In view of the fact that the rule against perpetuities is embodied in a statute and in the constitution in Wyoming, a court is without authority to carve out an exception to the constitutional and statutory provision or to circumvent the constitution and statute through the inference of any fictitious device. Williams v. Watt, 668 P.2d 620,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 348

(Wyo. 1983).

All executory interests are subject to invalidation by the rule against perpetuities.

Williams v. Watt, 668 P.2d 620,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 348

(Wyo. 1983).

Mineral interest following determinable fee valid when vested at time of its creation. —

It is reasonable and proper to identify an interest in a mineral estate following a determinable fee as a remainder which, when vested at the time of its creation, is valid under the rule against perpetuities. Williams v. Watt, 668 P.2d 620,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 348

(Wyo. 1983).

Preemptive right to buy partnership land not violative. —

Because a joint venture dissolves upon the death of any partner, such a venture incorporating a preemptive right to purchase partnership land at the market price does not violate the rule against perpetuities as the preemptive right must be exercised either within the lifetime of the first coadventurer to die or 21 years thereafter. Hartnett v. Jones, 629 P.2d 1357,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 353

(Wyo. 1981).

Public access interest. —

Fact that appellants entered into a contract for deed for 40 acres of property encumbered by a public access interest was proof of the alienability of the property. Therefore, the rule against perpetuities did not operate to void the public access provision.
Horse Creek Conservation Dist. v. State ex rel. Wyo. AG, 2009 WY 143, 221 P.3d 306,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 2009).

Quoted

in

Holland v. Windsor, 461 P.2d 47,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1969).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Settlor's reservation of right of revocation or termination of trust, or withdrawal of funds or invasion of corpus thereof, as affecting operation of rule against perpetuities, 7 ALR2d 1089.

Application of rule against perpetuities to trust for dissemination or preservation of material of historical or other educational interest or value, 12 ALR2d 849, 34 ALR4th 419.

Validity, under rule against perpetuities, of gift in remainder to creator's great-grandchildren following successive life estates to children and grandchildren, 18 ALR2d 671.

Time as of which members of class described as grantor's or settlor's “heirs,” “next of kin,” “relations,” and the like to whom a future gift is made, are to be ascertained, 38 ALR2d 327.

Option created by will to purchase real estate as affected by rule against perpetuities, 44 ALR2d 1214.

Application of rule against perpetuities to limitation over on discontinuance of use for which premises are given or granted, or the commencement of a prohibited use, 45 ALR2d 1154.

Postponement of enjoyment of interest as affecting validity of perpetual nonparticipating royalty interest in oil and gas under rule against perpetuities, 46 ALR2d 1268.

Rule against perpetuities as affecting validity of trust for maintenance or care of private cemetery, burial lot, tomb, or monument, 47 ALR2d 622.

Separability, for purposes of the rule against perpetuities, of gifts to several persons by one description, 56 ALR2d 450.

Lease for term of years, or contract therefor, as violating rule against perpetuities, 66 ALR2d 733.

Rule against perpetuities as affecting validity, as a charitable trust, of gift to church, church society, or trustees or officers thereof, without declaration or restriction as to its use or purpose, 81 ALR2d 819.

Applicability of equitable approximation doctrine to cut down to a permissible time period the time of a testamentary gift that violates the rule against perpetuities, 95 ALR2d 807.

Rule against perpetuities where estate is limited on alternative contingencies, one within and one beyond the period allowed by the rule against perpetuities for the vesting of estates, 98 ALR2d 807.

Doctrine as to possibility of issue extinct, as affecting rule against perpetuities, 98 ALR2d 1285.

Modern status of doctrine as to possibility of issue being extinct as affecting rule against perpetuities, 98 ALR2d 1285.

Distribution of income released by declaration of invalidity of express direction for accumulation, 17 ALR3d 231.

Doctrine that gift which might be void under rule against perpetuities will be given effect where contingency actually occurs within period of rule, 20 ALR3d 1094.

Preemptive rights to realty as violation of rule against perpetuities, 40 ALR3d 920.

Independent option to purchase real estate as violating rule against perpetuities, 66 ALR3d 1294.

Validity of statute canceling, destroying, nullifying, or limiting enforcement of possibilities of reverter or rights of reentry for condition broken, 87 ALR3d 1011.

§ 34-1-140.
Establishing joint tenancy or tenancy by entirety in real or personal property.

A joint tenancy or a tenancy by the entirety as to any interest in real or personal property may be established by the owner thereof, by designating in the instrument of conveyance or transfer, the names of such joint tenants or tenants by the entirety, including his own, without the necessity of any transfer or conveyance to or through a third person.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 43, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-40.1.

Creating instrument. —

Application to open the investment account was a “creating instrument,” and it gave formal expression to an agreement between the company and debtor and his non-debtor wife to create rights. The application contained a handwritten note expressly labeling the account as a tenancy by the entirety; therefore, it was evident from the language of the instrument itself that the parties thereto intended to create a right of survivorship.
Radiance Capital Receivables Nineteen LLC v. Crow (In re Crow), 987 F.3d 912, 2021 U.S. App. LEXIS 4078 (10th Cir. 2021).

Joint tenancies not favored. —

The common law relative to the presumption favoring joint tenancies has been modified by statute in Wyoming. Choman v. Epperley, 592 P.2d 714,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1979).

Checks, invoices and credit card bills not “instruments” whereby personal property ownership proved. —

Although a check may be an “instrument” within the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code (§ 34.1-3-102 (a)(v) (now see § 34.1-3-104)), the documents by which a bankruptcy debtor attempted to prove ownership by the entirety in certain household goods and artwork, i.e., checks, invoices and credit card bills, were not “instruments” within the meaning of that term as used by the courts to refer to a writing whereby a “chattel is embodied in a document.” Thus, with regard to such property, no “instrument” upon which an intent to create a right of survivorship could be noted. Since this property was not of the kind or nature for which the property right was in some manner embodied in a document, the property was not capable of being held by the entirety and the claimed exemption of the property in bankruptcy proceedings was disallowed. In re Anselmi, 52 B.R. 479, 1985 Bankr. LEXIS 6011 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1985).

Designation “husband and wife” evidenced that parties intended to create right to survivorship

in a contract for deed. Consequently, the husband, who was a bankruptcy debtor, and his wife held their interest in the payments due under the contract as tenants by the entirety which, under Wyoming law, was “exempt from process” and, hence, exempt under the Bankruptcy Code. In re Anselmi, 52 B.R. 479, 1985 Bankr. LEXIS 6011 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1985).

Right of survivorship not created by statement that “[x] and [y]” are owners. —

Certificates of stock stated that “[x] and [y]” were owners, but these parties were not designated as husband and wife, and the category of co-ownership, whether as tenants in common, joint tenants, or tenants by the entirety was not specified. From these words alone, no intention to create a right of survivorship could be found. Absent such a right of survivorship, the husband and wife held the stock certificates as tenants in common and the husband's one-half interest in the certificates was subject to the claims of his creditors in bankruptcy proceedings. In re Anselmi, 52 B.R. 479, 1985 Bankr. LEXIS 6011 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1985).

Joint tenant's title not defeated by other tenant's possession and income therefrom. —

One of the joint tenants remaining in possession of the property and receiving the income from it during his lifetime did not defeat the vesting of title in the other joint tenant. May v. McCormick, 704 P.2d 709,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 528

(Wyo. 1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Issuance of stock certificate to joint tenants as creating gift inter vivos, 5 ALR4th 373.

Proceeds or derivatives of real property held by entirety as themselves held by entirety, 22 ALR4th 459.

Judgment lien or levy of execution on one joint tenant's share or interest as severing joint tenancy, 51 ALR4th 906.

Property rights arising from relationship of couple cohabiting without marriage, 69 ALR5th 219.

§ 34-1-141.
Easements.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, easements across land executed and recorded after the effective date of this act which do not specifically describe the location of the easement are null and void and of no force and effect.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, agreements entered into after the effective date of this act which grant the right to locate an easement at a later date and which do not specifically describe the location of the easement are null and void.

For purposes of this section an easement or agreement which does not specifically describe the location of the easement or which grants a right to locate an easement at a later date shall be valid for a period of one (1) year from the date of execution of the easement or agreement. If the specific description is not recorded within one (1) year then the easement or agreement shall be of no further force and effect.

For purposes of this section the specific description required in an easement shall be sufficient to locate the easement and is not limited to a survey.

For purposes of this section options to obtain easements at a later date shall not be considered easements or agreements pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section and shall be for a period not to exceed seven (7) years.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 30, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

16-4-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2010, ch. 83, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “section” for “act” in (c) and (d).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2010 amendment,

added (e).

Laws 2010, ch. 83 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

The phrase “effective date of this act,” found in subsections (a) and (b), first appeared in Laws 1981, ch. 30. Laws 1981, ch. 30, § 2 makes the act effective on May 20, 1981.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides:

“[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Applicability. —

Wyoming's easement statute was not applied retroactively because an easement was obtained in 1979 by previous owners of a property, which preceded the enactment of Wyoming's easement statute. Therefore, the easement was valid and enforceable despite the lack of a specific description of its location.
Meckem v. Carter, 2014 WY 52, 323 P.3d 637,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2014).

Nonrecordation not fatal where notice of conveyance. —

The failure to record is not fatal where the proponent of the failure to record has full notice of the conveyance in question and suffers no prejudice. Emmett Ranch v. Goldmark Eng'g, 908 P.2d 941,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1995).

Description sufficient. —

Wyoming Supreme Court reversed a district court's holding that purchasers' license for fishing rights were void, where two separate sketch maps were incorporated and attached to the agreement to denote the applicable area of land involved, thereby fulfilling the requirements set forth by Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

34-1-141

. Markstein v. Countryside I, L.L.C., 2003 WY 122, 77 P.3d 389,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. Oct. 21, 2003).

Recreational easement in covenants providing access over the recreational land and hiking and riding trails near a rocky geological formation in a tract of land provided a sufficient description because the rock formation was easily locatable, both on the ground and on a record of survey, which marked its approximate location. Gumpel v. Copperleaf Homeowners Ass'n, 2017 WY 46, 393 P.3d 1279,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2017).

Retroactivity. —

This section did not apply retroactively to invalidate an easement for an electric transmission line for which no specific description was articulated where each successive owner of the parcel through which the easement ran took with both actual and constructive record notice of the easement. Edgcomb v. Lower Valley Power & Light, 922 P.2d 850,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1996).

Quoted

in

Dudley v. Franklin, 983 P.2d 1223,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1999); Hansuld v. Lariat Diesel Corp., 2015 WY 12,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Jan. 21, 2015).

Cited

in

Mueller v. Hoblyn, 887 P.2d 500,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 166

, 62 A.L.R.5th 847 (Wyo. 1994); Horse Creek Conservation Dist. v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Ag, 2009 WY 143, 221 P.3d 306,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Nov. 23, 2009); Platt v. Platt, 2014 WY 142,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Nov. 6, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Death of the Dark Ages? The Troubled Law of Easements in Wyoming,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 151 (1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Loss of private easement by nonuse, 62 ALR5th 219.

Validity and construction of provision of Cable Communications Policy Act (47 USC § 541(a)(2)) allowing cable companies access to utility easements on private property, 113 ALR Fed 523.

§ 34-1-142.
Instrument transferring title to real property; procedure; exceptions; confidentiality.

When a deed, contract or other document transferring legal or equitable title to real property, including instruments conveying ownership of structures on lands not owned by the transferring party, is presented to a county clerk for recording, the instrument shall be accompanied by a statement under oath by the grantee or his agent disclosing the name of the grantor and grantee, the addresses and contact information of the grantor and grantee, the date of transfer, date of sale, a legal description of the property transferred, the actual full amount paid or to be paid for the property, terms of sale and an estimate of the value of any nonreal property included in the sale.

No instrument evidencing a transfer of real property may be accepted for recording until the completed sworn statement is received by the county clerk. The validity or effectiveness of an instrument as between the parties is not affected by the failure to comply with subsection (a) of this section.

For instruments transferring title as described in this subsection, the presenting party may omit from the statement the amount paid or other consideration exchanged for the property, the terms of the sale and an estimate of the value of any nonreal property included in the sale that would otherwise be required to be included in the statement under subsection (a) of this section:

An instrument which confirms, corrects, modifies or supplements a previously recorded instrument without added consideration;

A transfer pursuant to mergers, consolidations or reorganizations of business entities;

A transfer by a subsidiary corporation to its parent corporation without actual consideration or in sole consideration of the cancellation or surrender of a subsidiary stock;

A transfer which constitutes a gift of more than one-half (1/2) of the actual value;

A transfer between husband and wife or parent and child with only nominal consideration therefor;

An instrument the effect of which is to transfer the property to the same party;

A sale for delinquent taxes or assessments or a sale or a transfer pursuant to a foreclosure;

Any other transfers which the state board of equalization and department of revenue exempts upon a finding that the information is not useful or relevant in determining sales-price ratios.

The sworn statements shall be used by the county assessors and the state board of equalization and the department of revenue along with other statements filed only as data in a collection of statistics which shall be used collectively in determining sales-price ratios by county. An individual statement shall not, by itself, be used by the county assessor to adjust the assessed value of any individual property.

The statement is not a public record and shall be held confidential by the county clerk, county assessor, county board of equalization, the state board of equalization and the department of revenue. A statement may be disclosed pursuant to W.S. 39-13-109(a)(i) to any person wishing to review or contest his property tax assessment or valuation. The statement shall not be subject to discovery in any other county or state proceeding.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 174, § 3.

As used in W.S.

34-1-142

through

34-1-144

:

A “review” is considered the initial meetings between the taxpayer and the county assessor’s office pursuant to W.S. 39-13-109(b)(i);

“Contest” means the filing of a formal appeal pursuant to W.S. 39-13-109(b)(i);

“Geographic area” may include any area requested by the property owner or his agent within the boundaries of the county in which the subject property is located.

The state board of equalization shall adopt rules and regulations to implement W.S.

34-1-142

and

34-1-143

which shall include forms to be used and which shall be used by county assessors and county clerks.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 170, § 1; 1986, ch. 9, § 1; 1991, ch. 174, § 3; 1995, ch. 209, § 1; 1996, ch. 92, § 1; 1997, ch. 147, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2009, ch. 141, § 1; 2010, ch. 20, § 1; ch. 82, § 1; 2020 ch. 72, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (g), substituted “pursuant to W.S. 39 13 109(b)(i)” for “as provided by law” and substituted “for properties of like use and geographic area available to” for “and all other information used by” in the first sentence and added “and including statements of consideration for properties of like use and geographic area which were available to the assessor and are requested by the person or his agent” to the end of the second sentence.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment by ch. 20 § 1, added the third sentence in the introductory language of (g); inserted “pursuant to W.S. 39-13-109(b)(i)” in (g)(i); and added (g)(iii).

Laws 2010, ch. 20 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2010.

The second 2010 amendment by ch. 82 § 1, made stylistic change.

Laws 2010, ch. 82 § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) added “including instruments conveying ownership of structures on lands not owned by the transferring party” following “real property” and “the addresses and contact information of the grantor and grantee” preceding “the date of transfer”; in (b) substituted “the completed sworn statement” for “the sworn statement”; rewrote the introductory language of (c), which read “This section does not apply to”; in (e) added “county board of equalization” following “county assessor,” substituted “revenue. A statement may be disclosed pursuant to W.S. 39-13-109(a)(i) to any person” for “revenue and when disclosed under subsection (g) of this section, any person” and “valuation. The statement” for “valuation and the county board of equalization. These statements,” and made stylistic changes; and in (g), deleted the first four sentences, which read “Any person or his agent who wishes to review his property tax assessment or who contests his property tax assessment or valuation in a timely manner pursuant to W.S. 39-13-109(b)(i) is entitled to review statements of consideration for properties of like use and geographic area available to the county assessor in determining the value of the property at issue as provided under W.S. 39-13-109(b)(i). During a review, the county assessor shall disclose information sufficient to permit identification of the real estate parcels used by the county assessor in determining the value of the property at issue and provide the person or his agent papers of all information, including statements of consideration, the assessor relied upon in determining the property value and including statements of consideration for properties of like use and geographic area which were available to the assessor and are requested by the person or his agent. The county assessor shall, upon request, provide the person or his agent a statement indicating why a certain property was not used in determining the value of the property at issue. The county assessor and the contestant shall disclose those statements of consideration to the county board of equalization in conjunction with any hearing before the board with respect to the value or assessment of that property.”

Scope of review limited. —

This section clearly allows review of only those individual statements the assessor used in determining owner's property tax. Bender v. Decaria, 998 P.2d 953,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Practitioner's Guide to Valuation and Assessment Appeals of State and Local Assessed Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 173 (1997).